Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1925
Bylaws.

(a) The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt bylaws for the corporation.

(b) The bylaws may contain any provision for regulating and managing the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 25.